Washington statutes.
RCW 6.32.190

Attendance of judgment debtor.

A judgment debtor who resides or does business in the state cannot be compelled to attend pursuant to an order made under the provisions of this chapter at a place without the county where his or her residence or place of business is situated. Where the judgment debtor to be examined under this chapter is a corporation the court may cause such corporation to appear and be examined by making like order or orders as are prescribed in this chapter, directed to any officer or officers thereof.

[ 2011 c 336 s 161; 1893 c 133 s 19; RRS s 631.]